District of Columbia statutes.
26-1320

Wilful false swearing; misappropriation.

Any wilful false swearing in regard to any certificate or report or public notice required by the provisions of this chapter shall be perjury and shall be punished as such according to the laws of the District of Columbia. Any misappropriation of any of the money of any corporation or company formed under this chapter, or of any money, funds, or property intrusted to it, shall be held to be theft, and shall be punished as such under the laws of said District.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1307, ch. 854, § 732
Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164,§ 601(h), 29 DCR 3976
1981 Ed., § 26-420.
1973 Ed., § 26-320.